Utah statutes.
58-1-301.5.   Division access to Bureau of Criminal Identification records.
(1)  The division shall have direct access to criminal background information
maintained by the Bureau of Criminal Identification under Title 53, Chapter
10, Part 2, Bureau of Criminal Identification, for background screening of
licensure applicants as required in:
(a)  Section 58-31b-302 of Title 58, Chapter 31b, Nurse Practice Act;
(b)  Section 58-47b-302 of Title 58, Chapter 47b, Massage Therapy Practice
Act;
(c)  Section 58-55-302 of Title 58, Chapter 55, Utah Construction Trades
Licensing Act, as it applies to alarm companies and alarm company agents;
(d)  Section 58-63-302 of Title 58, Chapter 63, Security Personnel Licensing
Act; and
(e)  Section 58-64-302 of Title 58, Chapter 64, Deception Detection Examiners
Licensing Act.
(2)  The division access under Subsection (1) shall be in accordance with
Section 53-10-108.
